Illinois, session 104th, HB2550.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.2 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.2)7    Sec. 5-5.2. Payment. 8    (a) All nursing facilities that are grouped pursuant to 9Section 5-5.1 of this Act shall receive the same rate of 10payment for similar services.11    (b) It shall be a matter of State policy that the Illinois 12Department shall utilize a uniform billing cycle throughout 13the State for the long-term care providers.14    (c) (Blank). 15    (c-1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code, 16the methodologies for reimbursement of nursing services as 17provided under this Article shall no longer be applicable for 18bills payable for nursing services rendered on or after a new 19reimbursement system based on the Patient Driven Payment Model 20(PDPM) has been fully operationalized, which shall take effect 21for services provided on or after the implementation of the 22PDPM reimbursement system begins. For the purposes of Public 23Act 102-1035, the implementation date of the PDPM   HB2550- 2 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1reimbursement system and all related provisions shall be July 21, 2022 if the following conditions are met: (i) the Centers 3for Medicare and Medicaid Services has approved corresponding 4changes in the reimbursement system and bed assessment; and 5(ii) the Department has filed rules to implement these changes 6no later than June 1, 2022. Failure of the Department to file 7rules to implement the changes provided in Public Act 102-1035 8no later than June 1, 2022 shall result in the implementation 9date being delayed to October 1, 2022. 10    (d) The new nursing services reimbursement methodology 11utilizing the Patient Driven Payment Model, which shall be 12referred to as the PDPM reimbursement system, taking effect 13July 1, 2022, upon federal approval by the Centers for 14Medicare and Medicaid Services, shall be based on the 15following: 16        (1) The methodology shall be resident-centered, 17    facility-specific, cost-based, and based on guidance from 18    the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. 19        (2) Costs shall be annually rebased and case mix index 20    quarterly updated. The nursing services methodology will 21    be assigned to the Medicaid enrolled residents on record 22    as of 30 days prior to the beginning of the rate period in 23    the Department's Medicaid Management Information System 24    (MMIS) as present on the last day of the second quarter 25    preceding the rate period based upon the Assessment 26    Reference Date of the Minimum Data Set (MDS).   HB2550- 3 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1        (3) Regional wage adjustors based on the Health 2    Service Areas (HSA) groupings and adjusters in effect on 3    April 30, 2012 shall be included, except no adjuster shall 4    be lower than 1.06. 5        (4) PDPM nursing case mix indices in effect on March 6    1, 2022 shall be assigned to each resident class at no less 7    than 0.7858 of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 8    Services PDPM unadjusted case mix values, in effect on 9    March 1, 2022.10        (5) The pool of funds available for distribution by 11    case mix and the base facility rate shall be determined 12    using the formula contained in subsection (d-1). 13        (6) The Department shall establish a variable per diem 14    staffing add-on in accordance with the most recent 15    available federal staffing report, currently the Payroll 16    Based Journal, for the same period of time, and if 17    applicable adjusted for acuity using the same quarter's 18    MDS. The Department shall rely on Payroll Based Journals 19    provided to the Department of Public Health to make a 20    determination of non-submission. If the Department is 21    notified by a facility of missing or inaccurate Payroll 22    Based Journal data or an incorrect calculation of 23    staffing, the Department must make a correction as soon as 24    the error is verified for the applicable quarter.25        Beginning October 1, 2024, the staffing percentage 26    used in the calculation of the per diem staffing add-on   HB2550- 4 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1    shall be its PDPM STRIVE Staffing Ratio which equals: its 2    Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day 3    as published in the most recent federal staffing report 4    (the Provider Information File), divided by the facility's 5    PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target. Each facility's PDPM STRIVE 6    Staffing Target is equal to .82 times the facility's 7    Illinois Adjusted Facility Case-Mix Hours Per Resident Per 8    Day. A facility's Illinois Adjusted Facility Case Mix 9    Hours Per Resident Per Day is equal to its Case-Mix Total 10    Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 11    the most recent federal staffing report) times 3.662 12    (which reflects the national resident days-weighted mean 13    Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day 14    as calculated using the January 2024 federal Provider 15    Information Files), divided by the national resident 16    days-weighted mean Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per 17    Resident Per Day calculated using the most recent federal 18    Provider Information File.19        (6.5) Beginning July 1, 2024, the paid per diem 20    staffing add-on shall be the paid per diem staffing add-on 21    in effect April 1, 2024. For dates beginning October 1, 22    2024 and through September 30, 2025, the denominator for 23    the staffing percentage shall be the lesser of the 24    facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target and:25            (A) For the quarter beginning October 1, 2024, the 26        sum of 20% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing   HB2550- 5 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1        Target and 80% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 2        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 3        the January 2024 federal staffing report).4            (B) For the quarter beginning January 1, 2025, the 5        sum of 40% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 6        Target and 60% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 7        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 8        the January 2024 federal staffing report).9            (C) For the quarter beginning March 1, 2025, the 10        sum of 60% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 11        Target and 40% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 12        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 13        the January 2024 federal staffing report).14            (D) For the quarter beginning July 1, 2025, the 15        sum of 80% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 16        Target and 20% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 17        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 18        the January 2024 federal staffing report). 19         Facilities with at least 70% of the staffing 20    indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a per diem 21    add-on of $9, increasing by equivalent steps for each 22    whole percentage point until the facilities reach a per 23    diem of $16.52. Facilities with at least 80% of the 24    staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a per 25    diem add-on of $16.52, increasing by equivalent steps for 26    each whole percentage point until the facilities reach a   HB2550- 6 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1    per diem add-on of $25.77. Facilities with at least 92% of 2    the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a 3    per diem add-on of $25.77, increasing by equivalent steps 4    for each whole percentage point until the facilities reach 5    a per diem add-on of $30.98. Facilities with at least 100% 6    of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be 7    paid a per diem add-on of $30.98, increasing by equivalent 8    steps for each whole percentage point until the facilities 9    reach a per diem add-on of $36.44. Facilities with at 10    least 110% of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study 11    shall be paid a per diem add-on of $36.44, increasing by 12    equivalent steps for each whole percentage point until the 13    facilities reach a per diem add-on of $38.68. Facilities 14    with at least 125% or higher of the staffing indicated by 15    the STRIVE study shall be paid a per diem add-on of $38.68. 16    No nursing facility's variable staffing per diem add-on 17    shall be reduced by more than 5% in 2 consecutive 18    quarters. For the quarters beginning July 1, 2022 and 19    October 1, 2022, no facility's variable per diem staffing 20    add-on shall be calculated at a rate lower than 85% of the 21    staffing indicated by the STRIVE study. No facility below 22    70% of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall 23    receive a variable per diem staffing add-on after December 24    31, 2022. 25        (7) For dates of services beginning July 1, 2022, the 26    PDPM nursing component per diem for each nursing facility   HB2550- 7 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1    shall be the product of the facility's (i) statewide PDPM 2    nursing base per diem rate, $92.25, adjusted for the 3    facility average PDPM case mix index calculated quarterly 4    and (ii) the regional wage adjuster, and then add the 5    Medicaid access adjustment as defined in (e-3) of this 6    Section. Transition rates for services provided between 7    July 1, 2022 and October 1, 2023 shall be the greater of 8    the PDPM nursing component per diem or: 9            (A) for the quarter beginning July 1, 2022, the 10        RUG-IV nursing component per diem;11            (B) for the quarter beginning October 1, 2022, the 12        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 13        multiplied by 0.80 and the PDPM nursing component per 14        diem multiplied by 0.20;15            (C) for the quarter beginning January 1, 2023, the 16        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 17        multiplied by 0.60 and the PDPM nursing component per 18        diem multiplied by 0.40;19            (D) for the quarter beginning April 1, 2023, the 20        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 21        multiplied by 0.40 and the PDPM nursing component per 22        diem multiplied by 0.60;23            (E) for the quarter beginning July 1, 2023, the 24        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 25        multiplied by 0.20 and the PDPM nursing component per 26        diem multiplied by 0.80; or  HB2550- 8 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1            (F) for the quarter beginning October 1, 2023 and 2        each subsequent quarter, the transition rate shall end 3        and a nursing facility shall be paid 100% of the PDPM 4        nursing component per diem.5    (d-1) Calculation of base year Statewide RUG-IV nursing 6base per diem rate. 7        (1) Base rate spending pool shall be: 8            (A) The base year resident days which are 9        calculated by multiplying the number of Medicaid 10        residents in each nursing home as indicated in the MDS 11        data defined in paragraph (4) by 365.12            (B) Each facility's nursing component per diem in 13        effect on July 1, 2012 shall be multiplied by 14        subsection (A).15            (C) Thirteen million is added to the product of 16        subparagraph (A) and subparagraph (B) to adjust for 17        the exclusion of nursing homes defined in paragraph 18        (5). 19        (2) For each nursing home with Medicaid residents as 20    indicated by the MDS data defined in paragraph (4), 21    weighted days adjusted for case mix and regional wage 22    adjustment shall be calculated. For each home this 23    calculation is the product of:24            (A) Base year resident days as calculated in 25        subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).26            (B) The nursing home's regional wage adjustor   HB2550- 9 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1        based on the Health Service Areas (HSA) groupings and 2        adjustors in effect on April 30, 2012.3            (C) Facility weighted case mix which is the number 4        of Medicaid residents as indicated by the MDS data 5        defined in paragraph (4) multiplied by the associated 6        case weight for the RUG-IV 48 grouper model using 7        standard RUG-IV procedures for index maximization.8            (D) The sum of the products calculated for each 9        nursing home in subparagraphs (A) through (C) above 10        shall be the base year case mix, rate adjusted 11        weighted days.12        (3) The Statewide RUG-IV nursing base per diem rate:13            (A) on January 1, 2014 shall be the quotient of the 14        paragraph (1) divided by the sum calculated under 15        subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2);16            (B) on and after July 1, 2014 and until July 1, 17        2022, shall be the amount calculated under 18        subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (3) plus $1.76; and 19            (C) beginning July 1, 2022 and thereafter, $7 20        shall be added to the amount calculated under 21        subparagraph (B) of this paragraph (3) of this 22        Section. 23        (4) Minimum Data Set (MDS) comprehensive assessments 24    for Medicaid residents on the last day of the quarter used 25    to establish the base rate.26        (5) Nursing facilities designated as of July 1, 2012   HB2550- 10 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1    by the Department as "Institutions for Mental Disease" 2    shall be excluded from all calculations under this 3    subsection. The data from these facilities shall not be 4    used in the computations described in paragraphs (1) 5    through (4) above to establish the base rate. 6    (e) Beginning July 1, 2014, the Department shall allocate 7funding in the amount up to $10,000,000 for per diem add-ons to 8the RUGS methodology for dates of service on and after July 1, 92014:10        (1) $0.63 for each resident who scores in I4200 11    Alzheimer's Disease or I4800 non-Alzheimer's Dementia. 12    Beginning January 1, 2026, the rate must be multiplied by 13    5 for nursing facilities which have disclosed their status 14    as Alzheimer's special care units under the requirements 15    of the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementias Special 16    Care Disclosure Act. The Department must update the status 17    for nursing facilities for rates in effect each January 1. 18        (2) $2.67 for each resident who scores either a "1" or 19    "2" in any items S1200A through S1200I and also scores in 20    RUG groups PA1, PA2, BA1, or BA2.21    (e-1) (Blank).22    (e-2) For dates of services beginning January 1, 2014 and 23ending September 30, 2023, the RUG-IV nursing component per 24diem for a nursing home shall be the product of the statewide 25RUG-IV nursing base per diem rate, the facility average case 26mix index, and the regional wage adjustor. For dates of   HB2550- 11 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1service beginning July 1, 2022 and ending September 30, 2023, 2the Medicaid access adjustment described in subsection (e-3) 3shall be added to the product. 4    (e-3) A Medicaid Access Adjustment of $4 adjusted for the 5facility average PDPM case mix index calculated quarterly 6shall be added to the statewide PDPM nursing per diem for all 7facilities with annual Medicaid bed days of at least 70% of all 8occupied bed days adjusted quarterly. For each new calendar 9year and for the 6-month period beginning July 1, 2022, the 10percentage of a facility's occupied bed days comprised of 11Medicaid bed days shall be determined by the Department 12quarterly. For dates of service beginning January 1, 2023, the 13Medicaid Access Adjustment shall be increased to $4.75. This 14subsection shall be inoperative on and after January 1, 2028. 15    (e-4) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 162024, the Department shall increase the rate add-on at 17paragraph (7) subsection (a) under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 147.335 18for ventilator services from $208 per day to $481 per day. 19Payment is subject to the criteria and requirements under 89 20Ill. Adm. Code 147.335. 21    (f) (Blank).22    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, on 23and after July 1, 2012, for facilities not designated by the 24Department of Healthcare and Family Services as "Institutions 25for Mental Disease", rates effective May 1, 2011 shall be 26adjusted as follows:  HB2550- 12 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1        (1) (Blank);2        (2) (Blank);3        (3) Facility rates for the capital and support 4    components shall be reduced by 1.7%.5    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, on 6and after July 1, 2012, nursing facilities designated by the 7Department of Healthcare and Family Services as "Institutions 8for Mental Disease" and "Institutions for Mental Disease" that 9are facilities licensed under the Specialized Mental Health 10Rehabilitation Act of 2013 shall have the nursing, 11socio-developmental, capital, and support components of their 12reimbursement rate effective May 1, 2011 reduced in total by 132.7%.14    (i) On and after July 1, 2014, the reimbursement rates for 15the support component of the nursing facility rate for 16facilities licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled 17or intermediate care facilities shall be the rate in effect on 18June 30, 2014 increased by 8.17%. 19    (i-1) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 202024, the reimbursement rates for the support component of the 21nursing facility rate for facilities licensed under the 22Nursing Home Care Act as skilled or intermediate care 23facilities shall be the rate in effect on June 30, 2023 24increased by 12%. 25    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject to 26federal approval, effective July 1, 2019, sufficient funds   HB2550- 13 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1shall be allocated for changes to rates for facilities 2licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing 3facilities or intermediate care facilities for dates of 4services on and after July 1, 2019: (i) to establish, through 5June 30, 2022 a per diem add-on to the direct care per diem 6rate not to exceed $70,000,000 annually in the aggregate 7taking into account federal matching funds for the purpose of 8addressing the facility's unique staffing needs, adjusted 9quarterly and distributed by a weighted formula based on 10Medicaid bed days on the last day of the second quarter 11preceding the quarter for which the rate is being adjusted. 12Beginning July 1, 2022, the annual $70,000,000 described in 13the preceding sentence shall be dedicated to the variable per 14diem add-on for staffing under paragraph (6) of subsection 15(d); and (ii) in an amount not to exceed $170,000,000 annually 16in the aggregate taking into account federal matching funds to 17permit the support component of the nursing facility rate to 18be updated as follows:19        (1) 80%, or $136,000,000, of the funds shall be used 20    to update each facility's rate in effect on June 30, 2019 21    using the most recent cost reports on file, which have had 22    a limited review conducted by the Department of Healthcare 23    and Family Services and will not hold up enacting the rate 24    increase, with the Department of Healthcare and Family 25    Services. 26        (2) After completing the calculation in paragraph (1),   HB2550- 14 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1    any facility whose rate is less than the rate in effect on 2    June 30, 2019 shall have its rate restored to the rate in 3    effect on June 30, 2019 from the 20% of the funds set 4    aside. 5        (3) The remainder of the 20%, or $34,000,000, shall be 6    used to increase each facility's rate by an equal 7    percentage. 8    (k) During the first quarter of State Fiscal Year 2020, 9the Department of Healthcare of Family Services must convene a 10technical advisory group consisting of members of all trade 11associations representing Illinois skilled nursing providers 12to discuss changes necessary with federal implementation of 13Medicare's Patient-Driven Payment Model. Implementation of 14Medicare's Patient-Driven Payment Model shall, by September 1, 152020, end the collection of the MDS data that is necessary to 16maintain the current RUG-IV Medicaid payment methodology. The 17technical advisory group must consider a revised reimbursement 18methodology that takes into account transparency, 19accountability, actual staffing as reported under the 20federally required Payroll Based Journal system, changes to 21the minimum wage, adequacy in coverage of the cost of care, and 22a quality component that rewards quality improvements.23    (l) The Department shall establish per diem add-on 24payments to improve the quality of care delivered by 25facilities, including:26        (1) Incentive payments determined by facility   HB2550- 15 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1    performance on specified quality measures in an initial 2    amount of $70,000,000. Nothing in this subsection shall be 3    construed to limit the quality of care payments in the 4    aggregate statewide to $70,000,000, and, if quality of 5    care has improved across nursing facilities, the 6    Department shall adjust those add-on payments accordingly. 7    The quality payment methodology described in this 8    subsection must be used for at least State Fiscal Year 9    2023. Beginning with the quarter starting July 1, 2023, 10    the Department may add, remove, or change quality metrics 11    and make associated changes to the quality payment 12    methodology as outlined in subparagraph (E). Facilities 13    designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 14    Services as a special focus facility or a hospital-based 15    nursing home do not qualify for quality payments.16            (A) Each quality pool must be distributed by 17        assigning a quality weighted score for each nursing 18        home which is calculated by multiplying the nursing 19        home's quality base period Medicaid days by the 20        nursing home's star rating weight in that period.21            (B) Star rating weights are assigned based on the 22        nursing home's star rating for the LTS quality star 23        rating. As used in this subparagraph, "LTS quality 24        star rating" means the long-term stay quality rating 25        for each nursing facility, as assigned by the Centers 26        for Medicare and Medicaid Services under the Five-Star   HB2550- 16 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1        Quality Rating System. The rating is a number ranging 2        from 0 (lowest) to 5 (highest).3                (i) Zero-star or one-star rating has a weight 4            of 0.5                (ii) Two-star rating has a weight of 0.75.6                (iii) Three-star rating has a weight of 1.5. 7                (iv) Four-star rating has a weight of 2.5.8                (v) Five-star rating has a weight of 3.5.9            (C) Each nursing home's quality weight score is 10        divided by the sum of all quality weight scores for 11        qualifying nursing homes to determine the proportion 12        of the quality pool to be paid to the nursing home. 13            (D) The quality pool is no less than $70,000,000 14        annually or $17,500,000 per quarter. The Department 15        shall publish on its website the estimated payments 16        and the associated weights for each facility 45 days 17        prior to when the initial payments for the quarter are 18        to be paid. The Department shall assign each facility 19        the most recent and applicable quarter's STAR value 20        unless the facility notifies the Department within 15 21        days of an issue and the facility provides reasonable 22        evidence demonstrating its timely compliance with 23        federal data submission requirements for the quarter 24        of record. If such evidence cannot be provided to the 25        Department, the STAR rating assigned to the facility 26        shall be reduced by one from the prior quarter.   HB2550- 17 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1            (E) The Department shall review quality metrics 2        used for payment of the quality pool and make 3        recommendations for any associated changes to the 4        methodology for distributing quality pool payments in 5        consultation with associations representing long-term 6        care providers, consumer advocates, organizations 7        representing workers of long-term care facilities, and 8        payors. The Department may establish, by rule, changes 9        to the methodology for distributing quality pool 10        payments. 11            (F) The Department shall disburse quality pool 12        payments from the Long-Term Care Provider Fund on a 13        monthly basis in amounts proportional to the total 14        quality pool payment determined for the quarter. 15            (G) The Department shall publish any changes in 16        the methodology for distributing quality pool payments 17        prior to the beginning of the measurement period or 18        quality base period for any metric added to the 19        distribution's methodology. 20        (2) Payments based on CNA tenure, promotion, and CNA 21    training for the purpose of increasing CNA compensation. 22    It is the intent of this subsection that payments made in 23    accordance with this paragraph be directly incorporated 24    into increased compensation for CNAs. As used in this 25    paragraph, "CNA" means a certified nursing assistant as 26    that term is described in Section 3-206 of the Nursing   HB2550- 18 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1    Home Care Act, Section 3-206 of the ID/DD Community Care 2    Act, and Section 3-206 of the MC/DD Act. The Department 3    shall establish, by rule, payments to nursing facilities 4    equal to Medicaid's share of the tenure wage increments 5    specified in this paragraph for all reported CNA employee 6    hours compensated according to a posted schedule 7    consisting of increments at least as large as those 8    specified in this paragraph. The increments are as 9    follows: an additional $1.50 per hour for CNAs with at 10    least one and less than 2 years' experience plus another 11    $1 per hour for each additional year of experience up to a 12    maximum of $6.50 for CNAs with at least 6 years of 13    experience. For purposes of this paragraph, Medicaid's 14    share shall be the ratio determined by paid Medicaid bed 15    days divided by total bed days for the applicable time 16    period used in the calculation. In addition, and additive 17    to any tenure increments paid as specified in this 18    paragraph, the Department shall establish, by rule, 19    payments supporting Medicaid's share of the 20    promotion-based wage increments for CNA employee hours 21    compensated for that promotion with at least a $1.50 22    hourly increase. Medicaid's share shall be established as 23    it is for the tenure increments described in this 24    paragraph. Qualifying promotions shall be defined by the 25    Department in rules for an expected 10-15% subset of CNAs 26    assigned intermediate, specialized, or added roles such as   HB2550- 19 -LRB104 10563 KTG 20639 b1    CNA trainers, CNA scheduling "captains", and CNA 2    specialists for resident conditions like dementia or 3    memory care or behavioral health.4    (m) The Department shall work with nursing facility 5industry representatives to design policies and procedures to 6permit facilities to address the integrity of data from 7federal reporting sites used by the Department in setting 8facility rates. 9(Source: P.A. 102-77, eff. 7-9-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 10102-1035, eff. 5-31-22; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23; 103-102, 11Article 40, Section 40-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, Article 50, 12Section 50-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 137-1-24.)